Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 1 General Provisions
53-1-109. Drugs or devices deemed misbranded — Exemptions.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

If in package form, unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that, under this subdivision (a)(2)(B), reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by regulations prescribed by the commissioner;

If any word, statement or other information required by or under the authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed on the label or labeling with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs or devices, in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

If it is for use by humans and contains any quantity of the narcotic or hypnotic substance alpha eucaine, barbituric acid, betaeucaine, bromal, cannabis, carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, marijuana, morphine, opium, paraldehyde, peyote, or sulphonmethane, or any chemical derivative of those substances, which derivative has been found by the commissioner after investigation to be, and by regulations promulgated under this subdivision (a)(4) designated as habit forming; unless its label bears the name and quantity of proportion of the substance or derivative and in juxtaposition the statement “Warning — May be habit forming”;

If it is a drug and is not designated solely by a name recognized in an official compendium, unless its label bears:

The common or usual name of the drug, if there is a common or usual name; and

In case it is fabricated from two (2) or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each active ingredient, including the kind and quantity or proportion of any alcohol, and also including, whether active or not, the name and quantity or proportion of any bromides, ether, chloroform, acetanilid, acetphenetidin, aminopyrine, antipyrine, atropine, hyoscine, hyoscyamine, arsenic, digitalis, digitalis glucosides, mercury, ouabain, strophanthin, strychnine, thyroid, or any derivative or preparation of any of those substances contained in the drug; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subdivision (a)(5)(B) is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the commissioner;

Unless its labeling bears:

Adequate directions for use; provided, that where any requirement of this subdivision (a)(6)(A), as applied to any drug or device, is not necessary for the protection of the public health, the commissioner shall promulgate regulations exempting the drug or device from the requirements; and

Adequate warning against use in those pathological conditions or by children where its use may be dangerous to health, or against unsafe dosage or methods or duration of administration or application, in a manner and form that are necessary for the protection of users;

If it purports to be a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, unless it is packed and labeled as prescribed in the compendium; provided, that the method of packing may be modified with the consent of the commissioner. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia with respect to packaging and labeling, unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia;

If it has been found by the commissioner to be a drug liable to deteriorate, unless it is packaged in a form and manner, and its label bears a statement of precautions that the commissioner requires by regulations as necessary for the protection of public health. Regulations shall not be established for any drug recognized in an official compendium until the commissioner has informed the appropriate body charged with the revision of the compendium of the need for the packaging or labeling requirements, and the body has failed within a reasonable time to prescribe the requirements;

If it is a drug and:

Its container is so made, formed or filled as to be misleading;

It is an imitation of another drug; or

It is offered for sale under the name of another drug;

If it is dangerous to health when used in the dosage, or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended or suggested in the labeling of the drug; or

If it is a drug sold at retail for use by humans, and contains any quantity of aminopyrine, barbituric acid, cinchophon, dinitrophenol or sulfanilamide, or their derivatives, when used in the dosage, or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended or suggested in the labeling of the drug, unless it is sold on a written prescription authorized by a member of the medical, dental or veterinary profession who is licensed by law to administer the drugs, and its label bears the name and place of business of the seller, the serial number and date of the prescription, and the name of the member of the medical, dental or veterinary profession.

A drug sold on a written prescription signed or authorized by a member of the medical, dental or veterinary profession, except a drug sold in the course of the conduct of a business of selling drugs pursuant to diagnosis by mail, shall be exempt from the requirements of this section if:

The member of the medical, dental or veterinary profession is licensed by law to administer the drug; and

The drug bears a label containing the name and place of business of the seller, the serial number and date of the prescription, and the name of the member of the medical, dental or veterinary profession.

A drug or device that is, in accordance with the practice of the trade, to be processed, labeled or repacked in substantial quantities at an establishment other than the establishment where it was originally processed or packed, is exempt from the affirmative labeling and packaging requirements of this section, while it is in transit in intrastate commerce from the one establishment to the other, if the transit is made in good faith for those completion purposes only; but it is otherwise subject to all applicable provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-116.

Collateral References.

Drugs, validity of act of congress regulating branding of. 54 A.L.R. 736.

Misbranding or false labeling of drug products, statutory provisions against, as applicable to literature other than that attached to product itself. 143 A.L.R. 1453.

Law Reviews.

Products Liability: Tennessee Retailers, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 385.

53-1-110. Sale of new drugs.

No person shall sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold for sale or give away any new drug unless an application with respect to the drug has become effective under § 505 of the federal act.

This section shall not apply to:

A drug intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety in drugs; provided, that the drug is plainly labeled “For Investigational Use Only”; and provided, further, that all reports of investigations that are being made and that have been made to show whether or not the drug is safe for use, and whether the drug is effective in use are furnished upon request to the commissioner;

A drug sold in this state at any time prior to February 15, 1941, or introduced into interstate commerce at any time prior to the enactment of the federal act; or

Any drug that is licensed under the Virus-Serum-Toxin Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 151 et seq.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.17; Acts 1963, ch. 226, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-117; Acts 1986, ch. 485, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 505 of the federal act, referred to in this section, is a reference to § 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, compiled at 21 U.S.C. § 355.

Cross-References. “Federal act” defined, § 53-1-102.

Law Reviews.

Products Liability: Tennessee Retailers, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 385.

53-1-111. Cosmetics deemed adulterated.

A cosmetic shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

It bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render it injurious to users under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement of the cosmetic, or under conditions of use that are customary or usual; provided, that this subdivision (1) shall not apply to coal-tar hair dye, the label of which bears the following legend conspicuously displayed on the label: “Caution — This product contains ingredients that may cause skin irritation on certain individuals and a preliminary test according to accompanying direction should first be made. This product must not be used for dyeing the eyelashes or eyebrows; to do so may cause blindness”, and the labeling of which bears adequate direction to the preliminary testing. For the purpose of this subdivision (1), hair dye does not include eyelash dye or eyebrow dyes;

It consists, in whole or in part, of any filthy, putrid or decomposed substance;

It has been produced, prepared, packed or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;

Its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health; or

It is not a hair dye and it bears or contains a coal-tar color other than one from a batch that has been certified under the federal act.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.18; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-118.

Cross-References. “Federal act” defined, § 53-1-102.

Law Reviews.

Torts — 1957 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1218.

53-1-112. Cosmetics deemed misbranded.

A cosmetic shall be deemed to be misbranded if:

Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

In package form, unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure or numerical count; provided, that under this subdivision (2)(B) reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established by regulations prescribed by the commissioner;

Any word, statement or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed on the label or labeling with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use; or

Its container is so made, formed or filled as to be misleading.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-119.

53-1-113. False advertising.

An advertisement of a food, drug, device or cosmetic shall be deemed to be false if it is false or misleading in any particular.

For the purpose of this chapter, the advertisement of a drug or device representing it to have any effect in albuminuria, appendicitis, arteriosclerosis, blood poison, bone disease, Bright's disease, cancer, carbuncles, cholocystitis, diabetes, diphtheria, dropsy, erysipelas, gallstones, heart and vascular diseases, high blood pressure, mastoiditis, measles, meningitis, mumps, nephritis, otitis media, paralysis, pneumonia, poliomyelitis or infantile paralysis, prostate gland disorder, pyelitis, scarlet fever, sexual impotence, sinus infection, smallpox, tuberculosis, tumors, typhoid, uremia, or venereal disease, shall also be deemed to be false; provided, that no advertisement not in violation of subsection (a) shall be deemed to be false under this subsection (b) if it is disseminated only to members of the medical, dental, pharmaceutical or veterinary professions, or appears only in the scientific periodicals of these professions, or is disseminated only for the purpose of public health education by persons not commercially interested, directly or indirectly, in the sale of the drugs or devices; provided, further, that, whenever the commissioner determines that an advance in medical science has made any type of self-medication safe as to any of the diseases listed in this subsection (b), the commissioner shall by regulation authorize the advertisement of drugs having curative or therapeutic effect for the disease, subject to conditions and restrictions that the commissioner may deem necessary in the interests of public health; provided, further, that this subsection (b) shall not be construed as indicating that self-medication for diseases other than those listed is safe or efficacious.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-120.

Law Reviews.

Products Liability: Tennessee Retailers, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 385.

Collateral References.

False or fraudulent statements in advertisements, validity, construction, and application of statutes or ordinances directed against. 89 A.L.R. 1004.

53-1-114. Exemptions from labeling requirements.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a food item, including, but not limited to, biscuits, sandwiches, salads, slaw, cookies, candy and other desserts, shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of this chapter if the food item is:

Made on site;

Sold at retail to consumers on site; and

Made from products that are commercially available.

Acts 1990, ch. 1054, § 1.

53-1-115. Use of the name “catfish” — Enforcement — Rules and regulations — Violations — Penalties — Hearing.

The term “catfish” shall not be used as a common name or brand name or used to advertise, distribute, or label any fish or fish product, except for those species within the definition of catfish set out in § 53-1-102.

It is a violation of this section to use the term “catfish” in the advertisement, distribution, processing, labeling, or wholesale or retail sale of any of those species within the family of Siluridae , Clariidae and Pangasiidaae or any other species of fish not included within the definition of catfish set out in § 53-1-102.

This section shall apply only to the advertisement, distribution, processing, labeling, or wholesale or retail sale of:

Unprepared or packaged imported catfish and imported catfish products; and

Unprepared or packaged fish and fish products described in subsection (a).

The commissioner shall enforce the requirements of this section and is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this section.

In the event of a violation of this section, the commissioner is authorized to:

Order the processor, distributor, wholesaler or retailer to cease the distribution or sale of imported catfish or imported catfish products that are not labeled or are labeled in violation of this section;

Order the processor, distributor, wholesaler or retailer to cease the advertisement, distribution, labeling or sale of all other fish or fish products that are being advertised, distributed, labeled or sold in violation of this section;

Seek injunctive relief to stop practices that are in violation of this section; and

Order the processor, distributor, wholesaler or retailer to comply with this section or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this section.

Any person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation. Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate violation.

Any person aggrieved by an order or civil penalty imposed by the commissioner shall be entitled to a hearing in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2002, ch. 634, § 2.

53-1-116. Labeling of imported catfish.

Any food service establishment, as defined in § 68-14-302, that sells imported catfish or imported catfish products, as defined in § 53-1-102, shall label such catfish or catfish products as “imported” on its menus.

Acts 2010, ch. 1093, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The definition of “food service establishment” in 68-14-302, which is referred to in this section, was deleted pursuant to Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 23, as amended by Acts 2014, ch. 636, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 1093, § 2. July 1, 2010.